Washington statutes.
RCW 43.05.005

Findings.

The legislature finds that, due to the volume and complexity of laws and rules it is appropriate for regulatory agencies to adopt programs and policies that encourage voluntary compliance by those affected by specific rules. The legislature recognizes that a cooperative partnership between agencies and regulated parties that emphasizes education and assistance before the imposition of penalties will achieve greater compliance with laws and rules and that most individuals and businesses who are subject to regulation will attempt to comply with the law, particularly if they are given sufficient information. In this context, enforcement should assure that the majority of a regulated community that complies with the law are not placed at a competitive disadvantage and that a continuing failure to comply that is within the control of a party who has received technical assistance is considered by an agency when it determines the amount of any civil penalty that is issued.

[ 1995 c 403 s 601.]